District of Columbia statutes.
47-4473

Storage and sale of perishable property.

If the Mayor seizes property to enforce the payment of the tax, the property seized shall be kept in a safe and convenient place until the sale of the property. If the Mayor determines that the property seized may perish, may become greatly reduced in value while stored, or cannot be kept without great expense, the Mayor shall appraise the value of the property. If the Mayor can readily find the owner, the Mayor shall notify the owner in writing of the appraised value of the property. The Mayor shall return the property to the owner if, within the period stated in the notice, the owner either pays the Mayor the appraised value of the property or gives the Mayor a bond to pay the appraised amount at a time that the Mayor considers appropriate under the circumstances. If the owner does not pay the amount or furnish the bond in accordance with this section, the Mayor shall as soon as practicable, and without regard to the notice requirements under § 47-4472(b) and (d), make a public sale of the property under § 47-4472(e).

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 405(b), 48 DCR 334